Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4156.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 6-101.6, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 6-101.6. A. All contracts for employment of, or
related employee information worksheets for, a teacher or
administrator by a district board of education shall include the
following categories in a clear and concise format:
1. Employee information including:
Req. No. 15479 Page 1

a. employee's name,
b. degree(s) employee holds,
c. number of years of teaching credit for salary
purposes, and
d. step placement on salary schedule;
2. Job description and duties including:
a. a specific and clear description of the duties of the
employee,
b. the contract hours of the employee, and
c. a guaranteed uninterrupted, duty-free lunch period of
at least thirty (30) minutes each school day.
3. Salary information including:
a. pay based on state minimum salary schedule,
b. district salary supplement,
c. extra-duty or extracurricular salary amounts,
itemized,
d. other salary,
e. total salary,
f. dollar amount of salary paid in cash, and
g. dollar amount of salary paid in fringe benefits, as
defined and allowed by Section 18-114.14 18-114.15 of
this title, with an itemized list of each benefit and
amount paid toward it; and
3. 4. Benefits information including:
Req. No. 15479 Page 2

a. state-paid flexible benefit allowance amount,
b. district-paid retirement contributions (over any
amount for retirement insurance paid as part of salary
and excluding any amounts paid pursuant to Section 17-
108.1 of this title),
c. district-paid health insurance (over any amount paid
as part of salary),
d. other district-paid benefits, such as life, dental,
disability, salary protection, vision, cancer, health
supplemental insurance (over any amount paid as part
of salary),
e. other benefits, with an itemized list of each benefit
and dollar amount paid toward it (not including any
benefits paid as part of salary), and
f. total district-paid benefits (not including any
benefits paid as part of salary).
B. Beginning with the 2016-2017 school year, school districts
shall annually provide to each teacher and administrator a copy of
an employee information worksheet containing information for each
teacher or administrator in the categories listed in subsection A of
this section prior to the first payroll in November. School
districts shall designate one or more persons to review the
worksheet with any teacher or administrator upon request to answer
any questions.
Req. No. 15479 Page 3

C. The State Department of Education shall require in its
annual personnel report the amounts paid in each category set out in
subparagraphs a through g of paragraph 2 3 and subparagraphs a
through f of paragraph 3 4 of subsection A of this section,
disaggregated by the categories of administrative personnel and
certified teaching personnel.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 6-101.6c of Title 70, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, contracts for
employment of, or related employee information worksheets for, a
teacher shall not:
1. Include vague, unrestricted language describing the job and
duties of an employee including, but not limited to, the phrase "all
other duties as assigned"; or
2. Require uncompensated duties outside of contractual hours.
B. Contracts for employment of, or related employee information
worksheets for, a teacher may include agreed upon specified
additional duties outside of contracted hours if duties are
compensated at a clear and reasonable hourly rate or stipend.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby

Req. No. 15479 Page 4

decl ared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-2-15479 AQH 12/18/25




















Req. No. 15479 Page 5